Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB517.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 301. Organization of commission.(a) Composition.--The independent administrative commission known as the Pennsylvania Game Commission shall consist of nine competent citizens of this Commonwealth who shall be well informed on the subject of wildlife conservation and restoration and who shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of a majority of the elected members of the Senate. The Governor shall ensure that at least one member 123456789101112131415161718192021 appointed to the commission represents the interest of agricultural commodities that pertain to normal agricultural operations and wildlife.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agricultural commodity." As defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law."Normal agricultural operation." As defined in section 2 of the Right-to-Farm Law.Section 2. Sections 2122, 2125 and 2314(a), (b) and (c) of Title 34 are amended to read:§ 2122. Report to commission officer.Any person who kills any game or wildlife, other than raccoons, under the provisions of this subchapter shall, within 24 hours, report, orally or in writing, the killing to an officer of the commission. The report shall set forth the date, time and place of the killing, the number of species killed [and], the sex of the species[.] and the location of each carcass. The commission shall establish a self-reporting system that allows a person assigned to remove deer for crop damage purposes to report each harvest to an officer of the commission via a toll-free telephone number, online application or publicly accessible Internet website.§ 2125. Surrender of carcass [to commission officer].Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the entire carcass, including the head and hide[,] of all big game animals and the entire carcass of any other game or wildlife, other than 20250SB0517PN0480 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 raccoons, less entrails, shall be made available, unless otherwise directed by an officer of the commission, intact[, less entrails,] to any commission officer calling for them[.] or delivered to a processor for final disposition. As used in this section, the term "processor" means a location specified by the commission that is willing to accept donations of animals taken under this chapter.§ 2314. Trespass on private property while hunting.(a) [General rule] Trespass.--A person, while engaged in hunting or furtaking, commits an offense if, knowing that the person is not licensed or privileged to do so, the person:(1) enters or remains on any land of another without authorization to do so, when the land is posted in a manner prescribed by law or reasonably likely to come to the person's attention [or is fenced or enclosed in a manner manifestly designed to exclude trespassers; or];(2) enters or remains on any land of another without authorization and defies an order not to enter or to leave that has been personally communicated to the person by the owner of the land or other authorized person[.];(3) enters or remains on any land of another without authorization to do so, when the land is fenced or enclosed in a manner manifestly designed to exclude trespassers; or(4) subject to subsection (b), enters or remains on any land of another without authorization to do so when notice against trespass is given by the placement of identifying purple paint marks on trees or posts on the property in accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 3503(b)(1)(vi) (relating to criminal trespass).(b) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to an 20250SB0517PN0480 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unarmed person who enters onto posted property for the solepurpose of retrieving a hunting dog. Subsection (a)(4) shall not apply in a county of the first class or a county of the second class.(c) Penalty.--An offense under this section shall be graded as follows:(1) A person who violates subsection (a)(1), (3) or (4) commits a summary offense of the [third degree.] second degree and may result in forfeiture of the privilege to hunt or take game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth for a period of up to one year.(2) A person who violates subsection (a)(2) commits a misdemeanor[.] and shall result in forfeiture of the privilege to hunt or take game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth for a period of three years.(3) A person who commits a second or subsequent violation of this section within a seven-year period commits a misdemeanor, and the second or subsequent violation shall result in forfeiture of the privilege to hunt or take game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth for a period of [one year] five years.* * *Section 3. Title 34 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2931. Agriculture access permit list. No later than January 1, 2026, the commission shall develop and implement a program to connect landowners experiencing wildlife-related damage with qualified hunters who are available to assist in wildlife population control. The program shall include all of the following:(1) A system for landowners to request assistance from 20250SB0517PN0480 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified hunters.(2) A database, maintained by the commission, of hunters who demonstrate the qualifications specified by the commission for the program and who have elected to participate in the program.(3) A mechanism for matching landowners with qualified hunters based on geographic proximity, level of need and hunter availability.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0517PN0480 - 5 - 123456789